Alabama, session 2026rs, HB629.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. The boundary lines and corporate limits of
the Town of Mt. Vernon in Mobile County are altered and
rearranged to include within the corporate limits of the
municipality, in addition to the lands now included, all of
the following territory:
Territory A (Parcel Number 0102260000001.026)
Lot 1, Amended Plat of East Park Subdivision recorded
in Map Book 125 page 122, further described as follows,
to-wit:
Commence at a calculated point at the locally accepted
Northwest corner of Section 26, Township 2 North, Range 1
East, Mobile County, Alabama; thence North 85 degrees, 14
minutes, 22 seconds East, a distance of 4052.03 feet to a
point calculated in the Easterly right of way of U.S. Highway
Number 43; thence South 04 degrees, 53 minutes, 00 seconds
East, a distance of 680.27 feet to a set half inch rebar by
Precision Surveying (CA-788) at the Northwest corner of East
Park Boulevard; thence South 04 degrees, 53 minutes, 00
seconds East a distance of 60.00 feet to a set half inch rebar
(CA-788) located at the Northwest corner of Lot 1, Amended
Plat of East Park Subdivision, for a corner and point of
beginning of the parcel herein to be described; from this
point of beginning, thence along the South right of way of
East Park Boulevard and the North line of Lot 1 North 85
Page 1

East Park Boulevard and the North line of Lot 1 North 85
HB629 Enrolled
degrees, 07 minutes, 00 seconds East a distance of 222.50 feet
to a set half inch rebar (CA-788) the beginning of a curve
tangent to said line; thence Southeasterly a distance of 54.98
feet along the curve concave to the Southwest, having a radius
of 35.00 feet and a central angle of 90 degrees, 00 minutes,
00 seconds to a set half inch rebar (CA-788); thence along the
West line of a road right of way and the East line of this lot
South 04 degrees, 53 minutes, 00 seconds East tangent to said
curve, a distance of 151.07 feet to a set half inch rebar
(CA-788) at the Southeast corner of Lot 1; thence along the
South line of Lot 1, South 85 degrees, 07 minutes, 00 seconds
West a distance of 257.50 feet to a set half inch rebar
(CA-788) in the Eastern right of way of U.S. Highway 43;
thence along the East right of way of U.S. Highway 43 and the
West line of Lot 1 North 04 degrees, 53 minutes, 00 seconds
West, a distance of 186.07 feet to the point of beginning.
Territory B (Parcel Number 0102260000001.010)
Lot 2, Calvert Business Park, Phase One, according to
the plat thereof recorded in Map Book 120, Page 95 of the
records in the Office of the Judge of Probate, Mobile County,
Alabama.
Territory C (Parcel Number 0102260000001.011)
Lot 1, Resubdivision of Lots 3,4 & 5 Calvert Business
Park, Phase Two (Revises), according to the plat thereof
recorded in Map Book 128, Page 54, of the records in the
Office of the Judge of Probate of Mobile County, Alabama.
Territory D (Parcel Number 0102260000001019)
Lots 11 and 12 of Calvert Business Park, Phase Three,
Page 2

Lots 11 and 12 of Calvert Business Park, Phase Three,
HB629 Enrolled
according to the plat thereof recorded in Map Book 122, Page
82, of the records in the Office of the Judge of Probate of
Mobile County, Alabama.
Section 2. In accordance with Section 11-42-6 of the
Code of Alabama 1975, a map showing the proposed territory to
be altered, rearranged, and extended from the Town of Mt.
Vernon is on file and open to public inspection in the Office
of the Judge of Probate in Mobile County, Alabama.
Section 3. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2025.
Page 3

1, 2025.
HB629 Enrolled







________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 31-Mar-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 02-Apr-26 Passed



Page 4